Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1113
Election contest; service of writ; notice to parties required.

Any writ issued pursuant to section 32-1112 shall be served without delay on the election commissioner or county clerk by the sheriff of his or her county. The election commissioner or county clerk shall at once fix a day, not more than thirty days after the date of the receipt of such writ, on which he or she will proceed to open such ballots and shall cause notice in writing of the day so fixed to be served on the petitioner and the person whose election is being contested or their attorneys at least five days before such day. Such notice may be served in the manner provided in section 25-505.01.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 356.